Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5083.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "David Casey Act".
SECTION 2. Section 23-6.5-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-6.5 entitled "Automated
External Defibrillators Required at Public Places and Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to
read as follows:
23-6.5-4. Definitions.
The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:
(1) “Healthcare facility” means any healthcare facility licensed by the department of health
including any institutional health-service provider, facility, or institution, place, building, agency,
or portion thereof, whether a partnership or corporation, whether public or private, whether
organized for profit or not, used, operated, or engaged in providing healthcare services, including,
but not limited to: hospitals; nursing facilities; rehabilitation centers; kidney disease treatment
centers; health maintenance organizations; and facilities providing surgical treatment to patients
not requiring hospitalization (surgi-centers); hospice care; and physician ambulatory-surgery
centers and podiatry ambulatory-surgery centers providing surgical treatment. The term “healthcare
facility” also includes organized ambulatory-care facilities that are not part of a hospital but that
are organized and operated to provide healthcare services to outpatients, such as: central-services
facilities serving more than one healthcare facility or healthcare provider; treatment centers;
diagnostic centers; outpatient clinics; infirmaries and health centers; school-based health centers;

and neighborhood health centers. The term “healthcare facility” also includes a practitioner’s
(physician, dentist, or other healthcare provider) office or group of practitioners’ offices (whether
owned and/or operated by a hospital or an affiliate of a hospital or an individual practitioner, alone
or as a member of a partnership, professional service corporation, organization, or association).
(2) “Public place” means an enclosed area capable of holding three hundred (300) people
or more and to which the public is invited or in which the public is permitted, including, but not
limited to: banks; bars; educational facilities; laundromats; public or private golf courses; public
transportation facilities; reception areas; restaurants; retail food production and marketing
establishments; retail service establishments; retail stores; shopping malls; sports arenas;
government offices; theaters; and waiting rooms. A private residence is not a “public place” unless
it is used as a childcare or adult daycare facility.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000120/SUB A
========
LC000120/SUB A - Page 2 of 3